District of Columbia statutes.
32-211

Vacation permits.

The Board of Education shall have authority to issue a vacation permit to a minor between the age of 14 and 16 years, permitting employment during the regular summer vacation period of the public schools, or during the school term at such time as the public schools are not in session, if the age of such minor has been proved according to § 32-210, and such minor has in all other respects, except as to completion of the 8th grade, fulfilled the requirements for a work permit specified in this subchapter. These permits shall be different in color from the work permit allowing employment while school is in session and shall state the periods during which its use is valid.

History

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1002, ch. 908, § 12
renumbered as § 11 and amended June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(13), 23 DCR 520

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-511.
1973 Ed., § 36-212.